Georgia, session 2025_26, HB713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Legislative Integrity and
Representation Act of 2025."
H. B. 713
- 1 -

LC 28 5001
SECTION 2.
Chapter 1 of Title 28 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding the General Assembly, is amended by adding new Code sections to read
as follows:
"28-1-17.
(a) No rule, statute, or executive action shall limit the right of members of the General
Assembly to introduce, file, or advocate for legislation that represents the interests of their
constituents.
(b) Any attempt to place a limit on the number of bills or resolutions which a member of
the General Assembly may file shall be deemed an unconstitutional restriction on the
legislative process which infringes on the right of elected officials to serve the people
without arbitrary limitations.
(c) The General Assembly is the direct voice of the people, and no rule, statute, or
executive action shall diminish the duty of a member of the General Assembly to introduce
policies that address the needs and concerns of his or her constituents.
(d) This Code section reaffirms the constitutional principle of representative democracy
and that elected members of the General Assembly are sent to the General Assembly to
serve the best interests of their districts without restriction or interference that would
suppress the will of the voters.
(e) Therefore, the rights of members of the General Assembly to freely propose, debate,
and pass legislation are critical to ensuring a limited, accountable government that
functions on behalf of its citizens and not bureaucratic control.
(f) Any attempt to suppress a member of the General Assembly's ability to file and
introduce legislation shall be subject to judicial review under both state and federal
constitutional protections, and members of the General Assembly shall have standing to
challenge any such attempt in court, with legal representation to be provided by the
Legislative Constitutional Counsel's Office.
H. B. 713
- 2 -

LC 28 5001
(g) Any procedural attempt by the General Assembly to override this Code section without
a recorded vote shall be deemed null and void.
28-1-18.
(a) To ensure transparency and accountability in the General Assembly, the election of the
following positions shall require a physical, recorded vote of the house of the General
Assembly to which it is applicable:
(1) Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(2) Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives; and
(3) President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(b) In addition, the adoption or amendment of the rules for a house of the General
Assembly shall require open debate and a physical, recorded vote and, to be effective, must
receive approval by at least a two-thirds' majority vote of the body. The vote shall be
conducted publicly, and individual votes shall be entered into the legislative journal to
ensure accountability to constituents. Any rule or policy that eliminates or restricts such
recorded vote on such items shall be void and unenforceable.
28-1-19.
(a) There is established the position of Legislative Constitutional Counsel. The Legislative
Constitutional Counsel shall be a member in good standing of the State Bar of Georgia.
The Legislative Constitutional Counsel shall provide independent legal support to all
members of the General Assembly and shall advise and defend members of the General
Assembly in matters concerning constitutional rights, legislative procedures, and potential
legal violations which would affect the ability of such members to represent their
constituents.
H. B. 713
- 3 -

LC 28 5001
(b) The Legislative Constitutional Counsel shall not be subject to oversight or control by
the executive branch of government or any partisan leadership positions of the General
Assembly but shall instead be accountable only to the General Assembly as a whole.
(c) The Legislative Constitutional Counsel shall be appointed by a two-thirds' majority
vote of the House of Representatives and the Senate and shall not be removed without due
cause and a two-thirds' majority vote of the House of Representatives and the Senate.
(d) The Legislative Constitutional Counsel shall have such compensation and benefits as
may be provided by the General Assembly and shall have such staff and office space as
may be provided by the General Assembly."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 713
- 4 -